Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 3. False Medicaid Claims

§ 42-4-301.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Medicaid False Claims Act.”

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 42-4-302(a)(iii).

§ 42-4-302.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Claim” means any request or demand under the Medicaid program, whether under a contract or otherwise, for money, property or services that:

Is presented to an officer, employee or agent of the state or a political subdivision of the state; or

Is made to a contractor, grantee or other recipient, if the money or property is to be spent or used on the state’s behalf or to advance a state program or interest, and if the state provides or has provided any portion of the money or property requested or demanded.

“Material statement” means a statement that affects the payment or receipt of money or property;

“This act” means W.S.

42-4-301

through

42-4-306

.

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 42-4-303.
Acts subjecting person to treble damages; costs and civil penalties; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any person who commits any of the following acts in relation to the Wyoming Medicaid program shall be liable to the state for three (3) times the amount of damages which the state sustains because of the act of that person. A person who commits any of the following acts shall also be liable to the state for the costs of a civil action brought to recover any penalties or damages provided in this subsection, and shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each violation:

Knowingly presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim for payment or approval;

Knowingly makes, uses or causes to be made or used, a false record or statement material to a false or fraudulent claim;

Is a beneficiary of an inadvertent submission of a false claim to any employee, officer or agent of the state or a political subdivision of the state, or to any contractor, grantee or other recipient of state funds or funds of any political subdivision of the state, who subsequently discovers the falsity of the claim and fails to disclose the false claim and make satisfactory arrangements for repayment to the state or affected political subdivision within ninety (90) days after discovery of the false claim;

Conspires to commit a violation of paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the court may assess not more than two (2) times the amount of damages which the state sustains because of the act in violation of subsection (a) of this section, and no civil penalty, if the court finds all of the following:

The person committing the violation furnished officials of the state who are responsible for investigating false claims violations with all information known to that person about the violation within forty-five (45) days after the information is requested; and

The person has substantially cooperated with any investigation by the state.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to a recipient as defined by W.S. 42-1-101(a)(v). Any recipient who knowingly:

Presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim shall be liable to the state for the amount of damages which the state sustains because of the claim and shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00);

Violates paragraph (i) of this subsection a second or subsequent time shall be liable to the state for three (3) times the amount of damages which the state sustains because of the claim and shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

Quoted in

Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb.
26, 2015).

§ 42-4-304.
Investigations and prosecutions; powers of prosecuting authority; remedies for retaliation; venue; no private right of action.

The Medicaid fraud control unit created by W.S.

42-4-403

or a district attorney may investigate alleged violations of W.S. 42-4-303(a) and (c). If the Medicaid fraud control unit or district attorney finds that a person has violated or is violating W.S. 42-4-303(a) or (c), the unit or district attorney may bring a civil action under this section against that person.

Any employee, contractor or agent of a person being investigated for a violation of W.S. 42-4-303(a) shall be entitled to recover all economic damages suffered if that employee, contractor or agent is discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened, harassed or in any other manner retaliated against in the terms and conditions of employment because of lawful acts taken in good faith by the employee or others in an action reported, filed or investigated under this act. An action by an employee, contractor or agent under this subsection shall not be brought more than three (3) years after the date when the retaliation occurred. A person may bring an action in the appropriate district court for the relief provided in this subsection. This subsection shall not otherwise be construed to create a private cause of action for violations of this act and is limited to the remedies expressly created by this subsection related to employment retaliation.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any action under this act may be brought in the district court of any county in which the defendant, or any of them, resides. If the defendant is not a resident of the state of Wyoming, the action shall be brought in the first judicial district court in Laramie County.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing in this act shall be construed to create a private cause of action.

The remedies provided in this act are separate from and additional to any remedies available under the State Government Fraud Reduction Act.

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 96, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

in the first sentence in (a), substituted "Medicaid fraud control unit created by W.S.

42-4-403

or a district attorney" for "attorney general or a district attorney," and in the second sentence, substituted "If the Medicaid fraud control unit or district attorney" for "If the attorney general or district attorney" and "unit" for "attorney general."

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 96 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 42-4-302(a)(iii).

State Government Fraud Reduction Act. —

See §

9-11-101

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 42-4-305.
Limitation of actions; retroactivity; burden of proof.

A civil action under W.S. 42-4-304(a) shall not be brought more than six (6) years after the date on which the violation was committed or more than three (3) years after the date when facts material to the right of action are known or reasonably should have been known by the official of the state charged with responsibility to act in the circumstances, whichever occurs last, provided that in no event shall a civil action be brought more than seven (7) years after the date on which the violation is committed.

In any action brought under W.S. 42-4-304(a), the state shall be required to prove all essential elements of the cause of action, including damages, by clear and convincing evidence.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a guilty verdict rendered in a criminal proceeding charging false statements or fraud is admissible in any civil action which involves the same transaction as in the criminal proceeding and which is brought under W.S.

42-4-304

.

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.

§ 42-4-306.
Remedies under other laws; liberality of construction; joint and several liability.

The provisions of this act are not exclusive, and the remedies provided for in this act shall be in addition to any other remedies provided for in any other law or available under common law.

Liability pursuant to this act is joint and several for any violation done by two (2) or more persons.

History.

2013 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.